Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Facilities for Exploration, Production, or Transportation of Oil or Gas in Navigable Waters

§ 53-3-71.
Construction, operation and maintenance of facilities for exploration, production, or transportation of oil or gas in navigable waters.

Any person, firm or corporation duly authorized to engage in the exploration or production of oil, gas or other minerals under the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 29, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any person, firm or corporation duly authorized to engage in the transportation of oil, gas and other minerals under the provisions of Sections 29-1-101 through 29-1-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall have the right to construct, operate and maintain facilities incident to such operations in any of the navigable waters of the state upon obtaining from the state oil and gas board a permit for the construction, operation and maintenance of such facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-61; Laws, 1968, ch. 262, § 1, eff from and after September 1, 1968.

§ 53-3-73.
Fee for permit.

Any person, firm or corporation applying for a permit to construct a facility under Sections 53-3-71 through 53-3-75 shall pay to the state oil and gas supervisor a fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-62; Laws, 1968, ch. 262, § 2, eff from and after September 1, 1968.

§ 53-3-75.
Restrictions and prohibitions.

The right to construct, operate and maintain any facility as described in Section 53-3-71 in, on, under or across land which is submerged or wherever the tide may ebb and flow shall be subject to the following:

The paramount right of the United States to control commerce and navigation;

The right of the public to make free use of the waters; and

The restrictions and prohibitions contained in Section 81 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, as same may be amended.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-63; Laws, 1968, ch. 262, § 3, eff from and after September 1, 1968.